California, session 20252026, AB1125.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3212.2 of the Labor Code is amended to read:3212.2. (a) For an officer and employee in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation having custodial duties and for a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.38 of the Penal Code, employed by the State Department of State Hospitals, the term “injury” includes heart trouble that develops or manifests itself during a period while such officer or employee is in the service of such department or hospital.(b) The compensation that is awarded for heart trouble includes full hospital, surgical, medical treatment, disability indemnity, and death benefits, as provided by the workers’ compensation laws of this state.(c) The heart trouble so developing or manifesting itself in these cases shall be presumed to arise out of and in the course of the employment. This presumption is disputable and may be controverted by other evidence, but unless so controverted, the appeals board is bound to find in accordance with it. This presumption shall be extended to a member following termination of service for a period of three calendar months for each full year of the requisite service, but not to exceed 60 months in any circumstance, commencing with the last date actually worked in the specified capacity.